Hawaii statutes.
[§654-5] Delivery. The officer, having
taken possession of the property or any part thereof, shall forthwith deliver
the same to the plaintiff, unless before the actual delivery to him, the
defendant who had possession, or any person claiming an interest therein and a
right to the possession thereof upon making an affidavit of his interest and of
his right to the possession stating the grounds thereof, executes a bond to the
plaintiff in such amount and with such sureties as are approved by the court, conditioned
that he will appear in and defend the action, and deliver the property to the
plaintiff, if the plaintiff recovers judgment therefor, in as good condition as
it was when the action was commenced, and that he will pay all costs and
damages that may be adjudged against him for the taking or detention of the
property. Upon the furnishing of the bond the property shall be relinquished
to the defendant who had possession, unless the bond is furnished by another
person who has, by proper pleadings, presented an affirmative claim to the
property and has complied with the provisions of this chapter applicable to a
plaintiff, in which case the court shall determine the custody of the property.
[L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955, §244-25; HRS §654-26; am L 1972, c 90,
§1(e); ren HRS §654-5]

Cross References

Bond, see §78-20.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next